Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5371.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 45 of the General Laws entitled "TOWNS AND CITIES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 71
BURRILLVILLE AND GLOCESTER PUBLIC NOTICE ACT
45-71-1. Burrillville and Glocester public notice requirements.
Notwithstanding any public or general law to the contrary, effective January 1, 2026,
whenever it is required under this title or any other provision of the general laws that any notice or
publication be published by the town of Burrillville or the town of Glocester, in a public newspaper,
the notice may be published in any newspaper in general circulation within either of the
municipalities or other designated digital or print platform selected by the town council of either
municipality, which may be reasonably demonstrated to reach a larger portion of the population
within each such municipality, than a newspaper in general circulation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000866
========